Oklahoma, session 2025, SB717.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 73 O.S. 2021, Section 83, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 83. There hereby is created an improvement and
comprehensive community zoning district to be known as the “Capitol-
Medical Center Improvement and Zoning District”, to embrace all that
portion of the State of Oklahoma situated within the following
described boundaries as shown by the plats and records on file in
the office of the county clerk of Oklahoma County, Oklahoma:
Beginning at the point where the center of Northeast Twenty-third
Street intersects the East line of the present right-of-way of the
A.T. and S.F. Railway Company, THENCE Southward along said right-of-
way to the point where the North line of property abutting on
ENGR. S. B. NO. 717 Page 1

Nort heast Sixteenth Street intersects said right-of-way, THENCE
Eastward along the said North line of property abutting on Northeast
Sixteenth Street to the point where said line intersects the West
line of North Stiles Avenue, THENCE Southward along said West line
of North Stiles Avenue to the North line of Northeast Eighth Street,
THENCE Eastward along said North line of Northeast Eighth Street to
the West line of North Lottie Avenue, THENCE Northward along the
West line of North Lottie Avenue to the center of Northeast
Fifteenth Street, THENCE Westward along said center of Northeast
Fifteenth Street to the West line of North Kelley Avenue, THENCE
Northward along the West line of North Kelley Avenue to the center
of Northeast Thirtieth Fiftieth Street, THENCE Westward along said
center of Northeast Thirtieth Fiftieth Street to the West line of
North Walnut Avenue, THENCE Southward along said West line of North
Walnut Avenue to the center of Northeast Twenty-third Street to the
point of beginning; whether or not said land, or any part thereof,
shall be within the incorporated limits of any city of the first
class.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 73 O.S. 2021, Section 83.2, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 83.2. The Capitol-Medical Center Improvement and Zoning
Commission, after adoption of a master comprehensive plan as
hereinafter provided, shall have exclusive authority over the zoning
and regulation of the utilization of all property zoned commercial,
ENGR. S. B. NO. 717 Page 2

publ ic district, or health center in the above described Capitol-
Medical Center Improvement and Zoning District and no planning or
zoning commission of any subdivision of the state thereafter shall
have any authority or jurisdiction over property zoned commercial,
public district, or health center within said the area. The
Commission also shall have authority to approve or disapprove the
location and design of any improvements hereafter to be placed upon
any land property zoned commercial, public district, or health
center within said District the district, and no improvement
hereafter shall be placed upon any land within said District the
district, unless the location and design thereof shall be approved
by said the Commission. The word “improvements” as used in Sections
82.1 through 83.11 of this title shall include, but not be limited
to, (1) buildings, including additions to and alterations thereof,
(2) highways and thoroughfares, and access facilities thereto, (3)
parking lots and facilities, and (4) all other construction or
erections whatsoever, except that the word “improvements”
improvements shall not include existing municipal streets, alleys or
utility services, nor the maintenance or improvement thereof, except
insofar as the same serve state buildings or are located upon state
land.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.


ENGR. S. B. NO. 717 Page 3

Passed the Senate the 25th day of March, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate

Passed the House of Representatives the ____ day of __________,
2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives















ENGR. S. B. NO. 717 Page 4